Illinois, session 104th, HB5052.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 5Treatment Act is amended by changing Sections 1a and 5 and by 6adding Section 2-2 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 70/1a)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-1a)8    Sec. 1a. Definitions. 9    (a) In this Act: 10    "Acute sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has 11recently occurred. For patients under the age of 13, "acute 12sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has occurred 13within the past 72 hours. For patients 13 years old or older, 14"acute sexual assault" means a sexual assault that has 15occurred within the past 168 hours. 16    "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the meaning 17provided in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 18    "Ambulance provider" means an individual or entity that 19owns and operates a business or service using ambulances or 20emergency medical services vehicles to transport emergency 21patients. 22    "Approved pediatric health care facility" means a health 23care facility, other than a hospital, with a sexual assault   HB5052- 2 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1treatment plan approved by the Department to provide medical 2forensic examinations to sexual assault survivors under the 3age of 18 who present with a complaint of acute sexual assault. 4    "Areawide sexual assault treatment plan" means a plan, 5developed by hospitals or by hospitals and approved pediatric 6health care facilities in a community or area to be served, 7which provides for medical forensic examinations to acute 8sexual assault survivors that shall be made available by each 9of the participating hospitals and approved pediatric health 10care facilities. 11    "Assent" means the expressed willingness to participate in 12an activity or give permission. 13    "Board-certified child abuse pediatrician" means a 14physician certified by the American Board of Pediatrics in 15child abuse pediatrics.16    "Board-eligible child abuse pediatrician" means a 17physician who has completed the requirements set forth by the 18American Board of Pediatrics to take the examination for 19certification in child abuse pediatrics. 20    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.21    "Distant site" means the location, designated by the 22treatment hospital or approved pediatric health care facility, 23from which the qualified medical provider uses a TeleSANE 24interactive telecommunications system to precept a medical 25forensic examination. 26    "Emergency contraception" means medication as approved by   HB5052- 3 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) that can 2significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 72 3hours after sexual assault. 4    "Follow-up healthcare" means healthcare services related 5to a sexual assault, including laboratory services and 6pharmacy services, rendered within 180 days of the initial 7visit as a result of the sexual assault. 8    "Health care professional" means a physician, a physician 9assistant, a sexual assault forensic examiner, an advanced 10practice registered nurse, a registered professional nurse, a 11licensed practical nurse, or a sexual assault nurse examiner. 12    "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under the Hospital 13Licensing Act or operated under the University of Illinois 14Hospital Act, any outpatient center included in the hospital's 15sexual assault treatment plan where hospital employees provide 16medical forensic examinations, and an out-of-state hospital 17that has consented to the jurisdiction of the Department under 18Section 2.06. 19    "Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection 20Kit" means a prepackaged set of materials and forms to be used 21for the collection of evidence relating to sexual assault. The 22standardized evidence collection kit for the State of Illinois 23shall be the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence 24Collection Kit. 25    "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" means the law 26enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where an alleged sexual   HB5052- 4 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1assault or sexual abuse occurred.2    "Licensed practical nurse" has the meaning provided in 3Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 4    "Medical forensic examination" means health care delivered 5to patients in the care of a qualified medical provider 6working at a treatment hospital, treatment hospital with 7approved pediatric transfer, or an approved pediatric health 8care facility that is either performed by a qualified medical 9provider or precepted by a qualified medical provider and may 10include the use of a TeleSANE interactive telecommunications 11system. "Medical forensic examination" includes, but is not 12limited to, taking a medical history, performing photo 13documentation, performing a physical and anogenital 14examination, assessing the patient for evidence collection, 15collecting evidence in accordance with a statewide sexual 16assault evidence collection program administered by the 17Illinois State Police using the Illinois State Police Sexual 18Assault Evidence Collection Kit, if appropriate, assessing the 19patient for drug-facilitated or alcohol-facilitated sexual 20assault, providing an evaluation of and care for sexually 21transmitted infection and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), 22pregnancy risk evaluation and care, and discharge and 23follow-up healthcare planning. 24    "Originating site" means the treatment hospital or 25approved pediatric health care facility at which the patient 26is located at the time a medical forensic examination is   HB5052- 5 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1performed using a TeleSANE interactive telecommunications 2system. 3    "Pediatric health care facility" means a clinic or 4physician's office that provides medical services to patients 5under the age of 18.6    "Pediatric sexual assault survivor" means a person under 7the age of 13 who presents for a medical forensic examination 8in relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a sexual 9assault.10    "Photo documentation" means digital photographs or 11colposcope videos stored and backed up securely in the 12original file format. 13    "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine 14in all its branches. 15    "Physician assistant" has the meaning provided in Section 164 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987.17    "Precept" means to provide direct, one-on-one supervision, 18training, and mentorship to a student or trainee in a 19real-world clinical setting as an experienced healthcare 20professional as part of a method of clinical education.21    "Qualified medical provider" means a board-certified child 22abuse pediatrician, board-eligible child abuse pediatrician, a 23sexual assault forensic examiner, or a sexual assault nurse 24examiner who has access to photo documentation tools, and who 25participates in peer review. 26    "Registered Professional Nurse" has the meaning provided   HB5052- 6 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1in Section 50-10 of the Nurse Practice Act. 2    "Sexual assault" means:3        (1) an act of sexual conduct; as used in this 4    paragraph, "sexual conduct" has the meaning provided under 5    Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; or6        (2) any act of sexual penetration; as used in this 7    paragraph, "sexual penetration" has the meaning provided 8    under Section 11-0.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and 9    includes, without limitation, acts prohibited under 10    Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 of the Criminal Code of 11    2012. 12    "Sexual assault forensic examiner" means a physician or 13physician assistant who has completed training that meets or 14is substantially similar to the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner 15Education Guidelines established by the International 16Association of Forensic Nurses.17    "Sexual assault nurse examiner" means an advanced practice 18registered nurse or registered professional nurse who is 19designated as Adult/Adolescent, Pediatric/Adolescent, or both, 20according to the population of survivors the nurse is 21qualified to treat and:22        (1) is certified as a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner by 23    the International Association of Forensic Nurses; or24        (2) has completed training that meets the Sexual 25    Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines established by 26    the International Association of Forensic Nurses and is   HB5052- 7 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    approved by the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program 2    Coordinator.3    "Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program Coordinator" means 4an advanced practice registered nurse or a registered 5professional nurse that is a qualified medical provider, and 6who is the employee at Attorney General's Office who oversees 7the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program.8    "Sexual assault services voucher" means a document 9generated by a hospital or approved pediatric health care 10facility where the sexual assault survivor first presents and 11that may be used to seek payment for any ambulance services, a 12medical forensic examination, medical care and treatment as 13defined by 77 Ill. Adm. Code Part 545, laboratory services, 14pharmacy services, and follow-up healthcare provided as a 15result of the sexual assault. 16    "Sexual assault survivor" means a person who presents for 17a medical forensic examination or medical care and treatment 18in relation to injuries or trauma resulting from a sexual 19assault. 20    "Sexual assault transfer plan" means a written plan 21developed by a hospital and approved by the Department, which 22describes the hospital's procedures for transferring acute 23sexual assault survivors to another hospital, and an approved 24pediatric health care facility, if applicable, in order to 25receive medical forensic examinations performed by qualified 26medical providers.  HB5052- 8 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    "Sexual assault treatment plan" means a written plan that 2describes the procedures and protocols for providing medical 3forensic examinations to acute sexual assault survivors who 4present themselves for such services performed by qualified 5medical providers, either directly or through transfer from a 6hospital or an approved pediatric health care facility. 7    "TeleSANE interactive telecommunications system" means 8multimedia communications equipment that includes, at a 9minimum, audio and video equipment permitting two-way, real 10time interactive communication between a health care 11professional performing a medical forensic examination at an 12originating site and a qualified medical provider precepting 13the exam from a distant site. 14    "Transfer hospital" means a hospital with a sexual assault 15transfer plan approved by the Department. 16    "Transfer services" means the appropriate medical 17screening examination and necessary stabilizing treatment 18prior to the transfer of a sexual assault survivor to another 19hospital or an approved pediatric health care facility 20pursuant to a sexual assault treatment plan or areawide sexual 21assault treatment plan.22    "Treatment hospital" means a hospital with a sexual 23assault treatment plan approved by the Department to provide 24medical forensic examinations to acute sexual assault 25survivors.26    "Treatment hospital with approved pediatric transfer"   HB5052- 9 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1means a hospital with a treatment plan approved by the 2Department to provide medical forensic examinations to sexual 3assault survivors 13 years old or older who present with a 4complaint of acute sexual assault. 5    (b) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 62024. 7(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 104-386, eff. 1-1-26.) 8    (410 ILCS 70/2-2 new)9    Sec. 2-2. Use of TeleSANE. Beginning January 1, 2028, a 10treatment hospital, treatment hospital with approved pediatric 11transfer, or approved pediatric health care facility may 12submit a sexual assault treatment plan which includes the use 13of a TeleSANE interactive telecommunications system which 14allows a qualified medical provider to precept a medical 15forensic examination while located at a distant site.16    If a sexual assault treatment plan includes the use of a 17TeleSANE interactive telecommunication system, then the sexual 18assault treatment plan submitted to the Department shall 19include, at minimum, the following additional information:20        (1) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include a 21    staffing plan to provide medical forensic examinations to 22    either (i) all acute sexual assault survivors or (ii) 23    acute sexual assault survivors 13 years old or older while 24    transferring pediatric acute sexual assault survivors. 25    Approved pediatric health care facilities shall submit a   HB5052- 10 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    staffing plan to provide medical forensic examinations to 2    acute sexual assault survivors under the age of 18.3        (2) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include 4    protocols for training health care professionals at both 5    the originating and distant sites, which shall conform 6    with the following requirements. Health care professionals 7    at the originating site must complete didactic training 8    that meets or is substantially similar to the Sexual 9    Assault Nurse Examiner Education Guidelines, established 10    by the International Association of Forensic Nurses, prior 11    to performing medical forensic examinations using a 12    TeleSANE interactive telecommunications system. Training 13    for both originating and distant site health care 14    professionals shall include at least one mock medical 15    forensic examination using the TeleSANE interactive 16    telecommunications system described in the plan.17        (3) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include a 18    description of the TeleSANE interactive telecommunications 19    system, a plan for regular technology checks, and 20    protocols in the event of a failure of the TeleSANE 21    interactive telecommunications system.22        (4) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include a 23    description of the distant site location from which the 24    qualified medical provider or providers shall precept 25    medical forensic examinations using a TeleSANE interactive 26    telecommunications system. Hospitals shall designate a   HB5052- 11 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    distant site location that is compatible with the TeleSANE 2    interactive telecommunications system and protects the 3    privacy of the patient.4        (5) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include 5    protocols and policies to maintain a secure network to 6    host the TeleSANE interactive telecommunications system, 7    protect patient privacy and ensure that medical forensic 8    examinations are not recorded.9        (6) The sexual assault treatment plan shall include a 10    plan to educate the community, including local law 11    enforcement and rape crisis advocates, about medical 12    forensic examinations that use TeleSANE interactive 13    telecommunications.14    If a hospital submits all required information and the 15Department finds that the proposed sexual assault treatment 16plan meets the minimum requirements set forth in Section 5 of 17this Act and that implementation of the proposed plan would 18provide medical forensic examinations for acute sexual assault 19survivors, then the Department shall approve the plan. 20    (410 ILCS 70/5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-5)21    Sec. 5. Minimum requirements for medical forensic 22examinations provided to sexual assault survivors by hospitals 23and approved pediatric health care facilities.24    (a) Every hospital and approved pediatric health care 25facility providing medical forensic examinations to acute   HB5052- 12 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1sexual assault survivors under this Act shall, as minimum 2requirements for such services, provide the services set forth 3in subsection (a-5).4    A qualified medical provider must provide the services set 5forth in subsection (a-5) either in person or via a TeleSANE 6interactive telecommunications system, as ordered by the 7attending physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or 8a physician assistant. 9    (a-5) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 10approved pediatric transfer, or an approved pediatric health 11care facility shall provide the following services in 12accordance with subsections (a) and (b): 13        (1) Appropriate medical forensic examinations without 14    delay, in a private, age-appropriate or 15    developmentally-appropriate space, required to ensure the 16    health, safety, and welfare of a sexual assault survivor 17    and which may be used as evidence in a criminal proceeding 18    against a person accused of the sexual assault, in a 19    proceeding under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or in an 20    investigation under the Abused and Neglected Child 21    Reporting Act.22        Records of medical forensic examinations, including 23    results of examinations and tests, the Illinois State 24    Police Medical Forensic Documentation Forms, the Illinois 25    State Police Patient Discharge Materials, and the Illinois 26    State Police Patient Consent: Collect and Test Evidence or   HB5052- 13 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    Collect and Hold Evidence Form, shall be maintained by the 2    hospital or approved pediatric health care facility as 3    part of the patient's electronic medical record. 4        Records of medical forensic examinations of sexual 5    assault survivors under the age of 18 shall be retained by 6    the hospital for a period of 60 years after the sexual 7    assault survivor reaches the age of 18. Records of medical 8    forensic examinations of sexual assault survivors 18 years 9    of age or older shall be retained by the hospital for a 10    period of 20 years after the date the record was created. 11        Records of medical forensic examinations may only be 12    disseminated in accordance with Section 6.5 of this Act 13    and other State and federal law. 14        (1.5) An offer to complete the Illinois State Police 15    Sexual Assault Evidence Collection Kit for any acute 16    sexual assault survivor. If the offer to complete the 17    Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Collection 18    Kit is accepted by the survivor, then evidence collection 19    shall be completed based on the qualified medical 20    provider's clinical discretion, best practices for 21    evidence collection, and information provided by the 22    sexual assault survivor. A patient may decline any portion 23    of the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence Kit, 24    but if any evidence is collected, then that shall 25    constitute evidence collection being completed for the 26    purposes of this Section and subsection (e) of Section 2.   HB5052- 14 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    Nothing in this Section is intended to prohibit a 2    qualified medical provider from offering, on the 3    provider's own accord or in response to a survivor 4    request, an Illinois State Police Sexual Assault Evidence 5    Collection Kit to a sexual assault survivor who presents 6    at a treatment hospital, treatment hospital with approved 7    pediatric transfer, or approved pediatric health care 8    facility with a nonacute complaint of sexual assault 9    according to the qualified medical provider's clinical 10    discretion based on best practices for indications for 11    evidence collection. 12            (A) Appropriate oral and written information 13        concerning evidence-based guidelines for the 14        appropriateness of evidence collection depending on 15        the sexual development of the sexual assault survivor, 16        the type of sexual assault, and the timing of the 17        sexual assault shall be provided to the sexual assault 18        survivor. 19            The information required under this subparagraph 20        shall be provided to the sexual assault survivor by a 21        qualified medical provider either in person or via a 22        virtual or telephone consultation.23            The written information provided shall be the 24        information created in accordance with Section 10 of 25        this Act. 26            (B) A sexual assault nurse examiner conducting an   HB5052- 15 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        examination using the Illinois State Police Sexual 2        Assault Evidence Collection Kit may do so without the 3        presence or participation of a physician.4        (2) Appropriate oral and written information 5    concerning the possibility of infection, sexually 6    transmitted infection, including an evaluation of the 7    sexual assault survivor's risk of contracting human 8    immunodeficiency virus (HIV) from sexual assault, and 9    pregnancy resulting from sexual assault.10        (3) Appropriate oral and written information 11    concerning accepted medical procedures, laboratory tests, 12    medication, and possible contraindications of such 13    medication available for the prevention or treatment of 14    infection or disease resulting from sexual assault.15        (3.5) After a medical evidentiary or physical 16    examination, access to a shower at no cost, unless 17    showering facilities are unavailable.18        (4) An amount of medication, including HIV 19    prophylaxis, for treatment at the hospital or approved 20    pediatric health care facility and after discharge as is 21    deemed appropriate by the attending physician, an advanced 22    practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant in 23    accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and 24    Prevention guidelines and consistent with the hospital's 25    or approved pediatric health care facility's current 26    approved protocol for sexual assault survivors.  HB5052- 16 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (5) Photo documentation of the sexual assault 2    survivor's injuries, anatomy involved in the assault, or 3    other visible evidence on the sexual assault survivor's 4    body to supplement the medical forensic history and 5    written documentation of physical findings and evidence 6    beginning July 1, 2019. Photo documentation does not 7    replace written documentation of the injury.8        (6) Written and oral instructions indicating the need 9    for follow-up examinations and laboratory tests after the 10    sexual assault to determine the presence or absence of 11    sexually transmitted infection.12        (7) Referral by hospital or approved pediatric health 13    care facility personnel for appropriate counseling.14        (8) Medical advocacy services provided by a rape 15    crisis counselor whose communications are protected under 16    Section 8-802.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if there 17    is a memorandum of understanding between the hospital or 18    approved pediatric health care facility and a rape crisis 19    center. With the consent of the sexual assault survivor, a 20    rape crisis counselor shall remain in the exam room during 21    the medical forensic examination. 22        (9) Written information regarding services provided by 23    a Children's Advocacy Center and rape crisis center, if 24    applicable. 25        (10) A treatment hospital, a treatment hospital with 26    approved pediatric transfer, an out-of-state hospital as   HB5052- 17 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    defined in Section 5.4, or an approved pediatric health 2    care facility shall comply with the rules relating to the 3    collection and tracking of sexual assault evidence adopted 4    by the Illinois State Police under Section 50 of the 5    Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 6        (11) Written information regarding the Illinois State 7    Police sexual assault evidence tracking system. 8    (a-7) Every hospital with a treatment plan approved by the 9Department and every approved pediatric health care facility 10shall employ or contract with a qualified medical provider to 11initiate a medical forensic examination to a sexual assault 12survivor within 90 minutes of a concern arising at the 13hospital or facility of acute sexual assault. The provision of 14a medical forensic examination by a qualified medical provider 15shall not delay the provision of life-saving medical care. 16    (b) Before a medical forensic examination is provided, 17consent must be obtained in accordance with this Section. 18Evidence collection shall not be completed without first 19obtaining consent. 20        (1) Any person able to consent who is a sexual assault 21    survivor who seeks a medical forensic examination or 22    follow-up healthcare under this Act shall be provided such 23    services without the consent of any parent, guardian, 24    custodian, surrogate, or agent. 25        (2) If a minor sexual assault survivor under the age 26    of 18 is unable to consent to a medical forensic   HB5052- 18 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    examination, the examination may be provided with the 2    consent of the survivor's parent, guardian, or health care 3    power of attorney and with the assent of the sexual 4    assault survivor. 5        (3) If an adult sexual assault survivor is unable to 6    consent to a medical forensic examination, the examination 7    may be provided with the consent of the survivor's 8    guardian or health care power of attorney and with the 9    assent of the sexual assault survivor. 10    (b-5) Every hospital or approved pediatric health care 11facility providing medical forensic examinations to acute 12sexual assault survivors shall issue a voucher to any sexual 13assault survivor who is eligible to receive one in accordance 14with Section 5.2 of this Act. The hospital or approved 15pediatric health care facility shall make a copy of the 16voucher and place it in the medical record of the sexual 17assault survivor. The hospital or approved pediatric health 18care facility shall provide a copy of the voucher to the sexual 19assault survivor after discharge upon request.20    (c) Nothing in this Section creates a physician-patient 21relationship that extends beyond discharge from the hospital 22or approved pediatric health care facility. 23    (d) This Section is effective on and after January 1, 242024. 25(Source: P.A. 104-386, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB5052- 19 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    Section 10. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 2changing Section 5-905 as follows: 3    (705 ILCS 405/5-905)4    Sec. 5-905. Law enforcement records. 5    (1) Law Enforcement Records. Inspection and copying of law 6enforcement records maintained by law enforcement agencies 7that relate to a minor who has been investigated, arrested, or 8taken into custody before the minor's 18th birthday shall be 9restricted to the following and when necessary for the 10discharge of their official duties:11        (a) A judge of the circuit court and members of the 12    staff of the court designated by the judge;13        (b) Law enforcement officers, probation officers or 14    prosecutors or their staff, or, when necessary for the 15    discharge of its official duties in connection with a 16    particular investigation of the conduct of a law 17    enforcement officer, an independent agency or its staff 18    created by ordinance and charged by a unit of local 19    government with the duty of investigating the conduct of 20    law enforcement officers;21        (c) The minor, the minor's parents or legal guardian 22    and their attorneys, but only when the juvenile has been 23    charged with an offense;24        (d) Adult and Juvenile Prisoner Review Boards;25        (e) Authorized military personnel;  HB5052- 20 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (f) Persons engaged in bona fide research, with the 2    permission of the judge of juvenile court and the chief 3    executive of the agency that prepared the particular 4    recording: provided that publication of such research 5    results in no disclosure of a minor's identity and 6    protects the confidentiality of the record;7        (g) Individuals responsible for supervising or 8    providing temporary or permanent care and custody of 9    minors pursuant to orders of the juvenile court or 10    directives from officials of the Department of Children 11    and Family Services or the Department of Human Services 12    who certify in writing that the information will not be 13    disclosed to any other party except as provided under law 14    or order of court;15        (h) The appropriate school official only if the agency 16    or officer believes that there is an imminent threat of 17    physical harm to students, school personnel, or others who 18    are present in the school or on school grounds.19             (A) Inspection and copying shall be limited to 20        law enforcement records transmitted to the appropriate 21        school official or officials whom the school has 22        determined to have a legitimate educational or safety 23        interest by a local law enforcement agency under a 24        reciprocal reporting system established and maintained 25        between the school district and the local law 26        enforcement agency under Section 10-20.14 of the   HB5052- 21 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        School Code concerning a minor enrolled in a school 2        within the school district who has been arrested or 3        taken into custody for any of the following offenses:4                (i) any violation of Article 24 of the 5            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6            2012; 7                (ii) a violation of the Illinois Controlled 8            Substances Act; 9                (iii) a violation of the Cannabis Control Act; 10                (iv) a forcible felony as defined in Section 11            2-8 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 12            Code of 2012; 13                (v) a violation of the Methamphetamine Control 14            and Community Protection Act; 15                (vi) a violation of Section 1-2 of the 16            Harassing and Obscene Communications Act; 17                (vii) a violation of the Hazing Act; or 18                (viii) a violation of Section 12-1, 12-2, 19            12-3, 12-3.05, 12-3.1, 12-3.2, 12-3.4, 12-3.5, 20            12-5, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 25-1, or 25-5 of the 21            Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 22            2012. 23            The information derived from the law enforcement 24        records shall be kept separate from and shall not 25        become a part of the official school record of that 26        child and shall not be a public record. The   HB5052- 22 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        information shall be used solely by the appropriate 2        school official or officials whom the school has 3        determined to have a legitimate educational or safety 4        interest to aid in the proper rehabilitation of the 5        child and to protect the safety of students and 6        employees in the school. If the designated law 7        enforcement and school officials deem it to be in the 8        best interest of the minor, the student may be 9        referred to in-school or community based social 10        services if those services are available. 11        "Rehabilitation services" may include interventions by 12        school support personnel, evaluation for eligibility 13        for special education, referrals to community-based 14        agencies such as youth services, behavioral healthcare 15        service providers, drug and alcohol prevention or 16        treatment programs, and other interventions as deemed 17        appropriate for the student.18            (B) Any information provided to appropriate school 19        officials whom the school has determined to have a 20        legitimate educational or safety interest by local law 21        enforcement officials about a minor who is the subject 22        of a current police investigation that is directly 23        related to school safety shall consist of oral 24        information only, and not written law enforcement 25        records, and shall be used solely by the appropriate 26        school official or officials to protect the safety of   HB5052- 23 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        students and employees in the school and aid in the 2        proper rehabilitation of the child. The information 3        derived orally from the local law enforcement 4        officials shall be kept separate from and shall not 5        become a part of the official school record of the 6        child and shall not be a public record. This 7        limitation on the use of information about a minor who 8        is the subject of a current police investigation shall 9        in no way limit the use of this information by 10        prosecutors in pursuing criminal charges arising out 11        of the information disclosed during a police 12        investigation of the minor. For purposes of this 13        paragraph, "investigation" means an official 14        systematic inquiry by a law enforcement agency into 15        actual or suspected criminal activity; 16        (i) The president of a park district. Inspection and 17    copying shall be limited to law enforcement records 18    transmitted to the president of the park district by the 19    Illinois State Police under Section 8-23 of the Park 20    District Code or Section 16a-5 of the Chicago Park 21    District Act concerning a person who is seeking employment 22    with that park district and who has been adjudicated a 23    juvenile delinquent for any of the offenses listed in 24    subsection (c) of Section 8-23 of the Park District Code 25    or subsection (c) of Section 16a-5 of the Chicago Park 26    District Act.  HB5052- 24 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (j) Victims and their attorneys, except in cases of 2    multiple minor victims or multiple victims of sex offenses 3    in which case the information identifying the 4    nonrequesting victims shall be redacted.5    (2) Information identifying victims and alleged victims of 6sex offenses, shall not be disclosed or open to public 7inspection under any circumstances. Nothing in this Section 8shall prohibit the victim or alleged victim of any sex offense 9from voluntarily disclosing this identity.10    (2.5) If the minor is a victim of aggravated battery, 11battery, attempted first degree murder, or other non-sexual 12violent offense, the identity of the victim may be disclosed 13to appropriate school officials, for the purpose of preventing 14foreseeable future violence involving minors, by a local law 15enforcement agency pursuant to an agreement established 16between the school district and a local law enforcement agency 17subject to the approval by the presiding judge of the juvenile 18court. 19    (3) Relevant information, reports and records shall be 20made available to the Department of Juvenile Justice when a 21juvenile offender has been placed in the custody of the 22Department of Juvenile Justice.23    (4) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the inspection 24or disclosure to victims and witnesses of photographs 25contained in the records of law enforcement agencies when the 26inspection or disclosure is conducted in the presence of a law   HB5052- 25 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1enforcement officer for purposes of identification or 2apprehension of any person in the course of any criminal 3investigation or prosecution.4    (5) The records of law enforcement officers, or of an 5independent agency created by ordinance and charged by a unit 6of local government with the duty of investigating the conduct 7of law enforcement officers, concerning all minors under 18 8years of age must be maintained separate from the records of 9adults and may not be open to public inspection or their 10contents disclosed to the public except by order of the court 11or when the institution of criminal proceedings has been 12permitted under Section 5-130 or 5-805 or required under 13Section 5-130 or 5-805 or such a person has been convicted of a 14crime and is the subject of pre-sentence investigation or when 15provided by law.16    (6) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), 17law enforcement officers, and personnel of an independent 18agency created by ordinance and charged by a unit of local 19government with the duty of investigating the conduct of law 20enforcement officers, may not disclose the identity of any 21minor in releasing information to the general public as to the 22arrest, investigation or disposition of any case involving a 23minor. Any victim or parent or legal guardian of a victim may 24petition the court to disclose the name and address of the 25minor and the minor's parents or legal guardian, or both. Upon 26a finding by clear and convincing evidence that the disclosure   HB5052- 26 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1is either necessary for the victim to pursue a civil remedy 2against the minor or the minor's parents or legal guardian, or 3both, or to protect the victim's person or property from the 4minor, then the court may order the disclosure of the 5information to the victim or to the parent or legal guardian of 6the victim only for the purpose of the victim pursuing a civil 7remedy against the minor or the minor's parents or legal 8guardian, or both, or to protect the victim's person or 9property from the minor.10    (7) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit law 11enforcement agencies when acting in their official capacity 12from communicating with each other by letter, memorandum, 13teletype or intelligence alert bulletin or other means the 14identity or other relevant information pertaining to a person 15under 18 years of age. The information provided under this 16subsection (7) shall remain confidential and shall not be 17publicly disclosed, except as otherwise allowed by law.18    (8) No person shall disclose information under this 19Section except when acting in the person's official capacity 20and as provided by law or order of court.21    (9) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 22apply to law enforcement records of a minor who has been 23arrested or taken into custody on or after January 1, 2014 (the 24effective date of Public Act 98-61). 25    (10) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit law 26enforcement agencies from disclosing law enforcement reports   HB5052- 27 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1and records to the Attorney General for the purposes of 2complying with the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 3(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1037, eff. 8-9-24.) 4    Section 15. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Sections 3, 4, and 4.5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1403)7    Sec. 3. The terms used in this Act shall have the following 8meanings:9    (a) "Crime victim" or "victim" means: (1) any natural 10person determined by the prosecutor or the court to have 11suffered direct physical or psychological harm as a result of 12a violent crime perpetrated or attempted against that person 13or direct physical or psychological harm as a result of (i) a 14violation of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or 15similar provision of a local ordinance or (ii) a violation of 16Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 17of 2012; (2) in the case of a crime victim who is under 18 18years of age or an adult victim who is incompetent or 19incapacitated, both parents, legal guardians, foster parents, 20or a single adult representative; (3) in the case of an adult 21deceased victim, 2 representatives who may be the spouse, 22parent, child or sibling of the victim, or the representative 23of the victim's estate; and (4) an immediate family member of a 24victim under clause (1) of this paragraph (a) chosen by the   HB5052- 28 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1victim. If the victim is 18 years of age or over, the victim 2may choose any person to be the victim's representative. In no 3event shall the defendant or any person who aided and abetted 4in the commission of the crime be considered a victim, a crime 5victim, or a representative of the victim.6    A board, agency, or other governmental entity making 7decisions regarding an offender's release, sentence reduction, 8or clemency can determine additional persons are victims for 9the purpose of its proceedings. 10    (a-3) "Advocate" means a person whose communications with 11the victim are privileged under Section 8-802.1 or 8-802.2 of 12the Code of Civil Procedure, or Section 227 of the Illinois 13Domestic Violence Act of 1986.14    (a-5) "Confer" means to consult together, share 15information, compare opinions and carry on a discussion or 16deliberation. 17    (a-6) "DNA database" means a collection of DNA profiles 18from forensic casework or specimens from anonymous, 19identified, and unidentified sources that is created to search 20DNA records against each other to develop investigative leads 21among forensic cases. 22    (a-7) "Sentence" includes, but is not limited to, the 23imposition of sentence, a request for a reduction in sentence, 24parole, mandatory supervised release, aftercare release, early 25release, inpatient treatment, outpatient treatment, 26conditional release after a finding that the defendant is not   HB5052- 29 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1guilty by reason of insanity, clemency, or a proposal that 2would reduce the defendant's sentence or result in the 3defendant's release. "Early release" refers to a discretionary 4release. 5    (a-9) "Sentencing" includes, but is not limited to, the 6imposition of sentence and a request for a reduction in 7sentence, parole, mandatory supervised release, aftercare 8release, early release, consideration of inpatient treatment 9or outpatient treatment, or conditional release after a 10finding that the defendant is not guilty by reason of 11insanity. 12    (a-10) "Status hearing" means a hearing designed to 13provide information to the court, at which no motion of a 14substantive nature and no constitutional or statutory right of 15a crime victim is implicated or at issue. 16    (b) "Witness" means: any person who personally observed 17the commission of a crime and who will testify on behalf of the 18State of Illinois; or a person who will be called by the 19prosecution to give testimony establishing a necessary nexus 20between the offender and the violent crime.21    (c) "Violent crime" means: (1) any felony in which force 22or threat of force was used against the victim; (2) any offense 23involving sexual exploitation, sexual conduct, or sexual 24penetration; (3) a violation of Section 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 2511-20.3, 11-23, or 11-23.5 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 26Criminal Code of 2012; (4) domestic battery or stalking; (5)   HB5052- 30 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1violation of an order of protection, a civil no contact order, 2or a stalking no contact order; (6) any misdemeanor which 3results in death or great bodily harm to the victim; or (7) any 4violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5Criminal Code of 2012, or Section 11-501 of the Illinois 6Vehicle Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance, if 7the violation resulted in personal injury or death. "Violent 8crime" includes any action committed by a juvenile that would 9be a violent crime if committed by an adult. For the purposes 10of this paragraph, "personal injury" shall include any Type A 11injury as indicated on the traffic crash report completed by a 12law enforcement officer that requires immediate professional 13attention in either a doctor's office or medical facility. A 14type A injury shall include severely bleeding wounds, 15distorted extremities, and injuries that require the injured 16party to be carried from the scene.17    (d) (Blank).18    (e) "Court proceedings" includes, but is not limited to, 19the preliminary hearing, any post-arraignment hearing the 20effect of which may be the release of the defendant from 21custody or to alter the conditions of pretrial release, 22including determinations made under subsection (g) or (j) of 23Section 110-6 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, 24change of plea hearing, the trial, any pretrial or post-trial 25hearing, sentencing, any oral argument or hearing before an 26Illinois appellate court, any hearing under the Mental Health   HB5052- 31 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1and Developmental Disabilities Code or Section 5-2-4 of the 2Unified Code of Corrections after a finding that the defendant 3is not guilty by reason of insanity, including a hearing for 4conditional release, any hearing related to a modification of 5sentence, probation revocation hearing, aftercare release or 6parole hearings, post-conviction relief proceedings, habeas 7corpus proceedings and clemency proceedings related to the 8defendant's conviction or sentence. For purposes of the 9victim's right to be present, "court proceedings" does not 10include (1) grand jury proceedings, (2) status hearings, or 11(3) the issuance of an order or decision of an Illinois court 12that dismisses a charge, reverses a conviction, reduces a 13sentence, or releases an offender under a court rule.14    (f) "Concerned citizen" includes relatives of the victim, 15friends of the victim, witnesses to the crime, or any other 16person associated with the victim or prisoner. 17    (g) "Victim's attorney" means an attorney retained by the 18victim for the purposes of asserting the victim's 19constitutional and statutory rights. An attorney retained by 20the victim means an attorney who is hired to represent the 21victim at the victim's expense or an attorney who has agreed to 22provide pro bono representation. Nothing in this statute 23creates a right to counsel at public expense for a victim. 24    (h) "Support person" means a person chosen by a victim to 25be present at court proceedings. 26(Source: P.A. 103-792, eff. 1-1-25; 104-173, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB5052- 32 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    (725 ILCS 120/4)2    Sec. 4. Rights of crime victims. 3    (a) Crime victims shall have the following rights:4        (1) The right to be treated with fairness and respect 5    for their dignity and privacy and to be free from 6    harassment, intimidation, and abuse throughout the 7    criminal justice process.8        (1.1) (Blank). When a person reports being a crime 9    victim as defined in Section 3, the right to be treated 10    with fairness and respect during the investigatory 11    process, including the right to be free from deception, 12    which is the knowing communication of false facts about 13    evidence. 14        (1.5) The right to notice and to a hearing before a 15    court ruling on a request for access to any of the victim's 16    records, information, or communications which are 17    privileged or confidential by law. 18        (1.6) (Blank). Except as otherwise provided in Section 19    9.5 of the Criminal Identification Act or Section 3-3013 20    of the Counties Code, whenever a person's DNA profile is 21    collected due to the person being a victim of a crime, as 22    identified by law enforcement, that specific profile 23    collected in conjunction with that criminal investigation 24    shall not be entered into any DNA database. Nothing in 25    this paragraph (1.6) shall be interpreted to contradict   HB5052- 33 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    rules and regulations developed by the Federal Bureau of 2    Investigation relating to the National DNA Index System or 3    Combined DNA Index System. 4         (2) The right to timely notification of all court 5    proceedings. Timely notification shall include 7 days' 6    notice of all court proceedings. 7         (3) The right to communicate with the prosecution.8         (4) The right to be heard at any post-arraignment 9    court proceeding in which a right of the victim is at issue 10    and any court proceeding involving a post-arraignment 11    release decision, plea, or sentencing.12         (5) The right to be notified of the conviction, the 13    sentence, the imprisonment, and the release of the 14    accused.15         (6) The right to the timely disposition of the case 16    following the arrest of the accused.17         (7) The right to be reasonably protected from the 18    accused through the criminal justice process.19         (7.5) The right to have the safety of the victim and 20    the victim's family considered in determining whether to 21    release the defendant and setting conditions of release 22    after arrest and conviction. 23         (8) The right to be present at the trial and all other 24    court proceedings on the same basis as the accused, unless 25    the victim is to testify and the court determines that the 26    victim's testimony would be materially affected if the   HB5052- 34 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    victim hears other testimony at the trial.2         (9) The right to have present at all court 3    proceedings, including proceedings under the Juvenile 4    Court Act of 1987, subject to the rules of evidence, an 5    advocate and other support person of the victim's choice.6         (10) The right to restitution.7    (b) Any law enforcement agency that investigates an 8offense committed in this State shall provide a crime victim 9with a written statement and explanation of the rights of 10crime victims under Public Act 99-413 this amendatory Act of 11the 99th General Assembly within 48 hours of law enforcement's 12initial contact with a victim. The statement shall include 13information about crime victim compensation, including how to 14contact the Office of the Illinois Attorney General to file a 15claim, and appropriate referrals to local and State programs 16that provide victim services. The content of the statement 17shall be provided to law enforcement by the Attorney General. 18Law enforcement shall also provide a crime victim with a 19sign-off sheet that the victim shall sign and date as an 20acknowledgement that he or she has been furnished with 21information and an explanation of the rights of crime victims 22and compensation set forth in this Act.23    (b-5) Upon the request of the victim, the law enforcement 24agency having jurisdiction shall provide a free copy of the 25police report concerning the victim's incident, as soon as 26practicable, but in no event later than 5 business days from   HB5052- 35 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1the request. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted 2to contradict the requirements of the Juvenile Court Act of 31987. 4    (c) The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall post the rights of 5crime victims set forth in Article I, Section 8.1(a) of the 6Illinois Constitution and subsection (a) of this Section 7within 3 feet of the door to any courtroom where criminal 8proceedings are conducted. The clerk may also post the rights 9in other locations in the courthouse.10    (d) At any point, the victim has the right to retain a 11victim's attorney who may be present during all stages of any 12interview, investigation, or other interaction with 13representatives of the criminal justice system. Treatment of 14the victim should not be affected or altered in any way as a 15result of the victim's decision to exercise this right. 16(Source: P.A. 103-792, eff. 1-1-25; 104-173, eff. 1-1-26; 17104-326, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-21-25.) 18    (725 ILCS 120/4.5)19    Sec. 4.5. Procedures to implement the rights of crime 20victims. To afford crime victims their rights, law 21enforcement, prosecutors, judges, and corrections will provide 22information, as appropriate, of the following procedures:23    (a) At the request of the crime victim, law enforcement 24authorities investigating the case shall provide notice of the 25status of the investigation, except where the State's Attorney   HB5052- 36 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1determines that disclosure of such information would 2unreasonably interfere with the investigation, until such time 3as the alleged assailant is apprehended or the investigation 4is closed.5    (a-5) When law enforcement authorities reopen a closed 6case to resume investigating, they shall provide notice of the 7reopening of the case, except where the State's Attorney 8determines that disclosure of such information would 9unreasonably interfere with the investigation. 10    (a-6) The Prisoner Review Board shall publish on its 11official public website and provide to registered victims 12information regarding how to submit a victim impact statement. 13The Prisoner Review Board shall consider victim impact 14statements from any registered victims. Any registered victim, 15including a person who has had a final, plenary, 16non-emergency, or emergency protective order granted against 17the petitioner or parole candidate under Article 112A of the 18Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, the Illinois Domestic 19Violence Act of 1986, the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or the 20Civil No Contact Order Act, may present victim statements that 21the Prisoner Review Board shall consider in its deliberations. 22    (b) The office of the State's Attorney:23        (1) shall provide notice of the filing of an 24    information, the return of an indictment, or the filing of 25    a petition to adjudicate a minor as a delinquent for a 26    violent crime;  HB5052- 37 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (2) shall provide 7 days' notice of the date, time, 2    expected purpose, and place of court proceedings; of any 3    change in the date, time, expected purpose, and place of 4    court proceedings; and of any cancellation of court 5    proceedings. For preliminary hearings and hearings 6    regarding pretrial release or that alter the conditions of 7    pretrial release only, if giving the victim 7 days' notice 8    is impossible, fewer days may be timely, so long as the 9    notice is provided as soon as practicable and in advance 10    of the proceeding. Notice shall be provided in sufficient 11    time, wherever possible, for the victim to make 12    arrangements to attend or to prevent an unnecessary 13    appearance at court proceedings;14        (3) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 15    information of social services and financial assistance 16    available for victims of crime, including information of 17    how to apply for these services and assistance;18        (3.5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 19    information about available victim services, including 20    referrals to programs, counselors, and agencies that 21    assist a victim to deal with trauma, loss, and grief; 22        (4) shall assist in having any stolen or other 23    personal property held by law enforcement authorities for 24    evidentiary or other purposes returned as expeditiously as 25    possible, pursuant to the procedures set out in Section 26    115-9 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;  HB5052- 38 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 2    appropriate employer intercession services to ensure that 3    employers of victims will cooperate with the criminal 4    justice system in order to minimize an employee's loss of 5    pay and other benefits resulting from court appearances;6        (6) shall provide, whenever possible, a secure waiting 7    area during court proceedings that does not require 8    victims to be in close proximity to defendants or 9    juveniles accused of a violent crime, and their families 10    and friends;11        (7) shall provide notice to the crime victim of the 12    right to have a translator present at all court 13    proceedings and, in compliance with the federal Americans 14    with Disabilities Act of 1990, the right to communications 15    access through a sign language interpreter or by other 16    means;17        (8) (blank);18        (8.5) shall inform the victim of the right to be 19    present at all court proceedings, unless the victim is to 20    testify and the court determines that the victim's 21    testimony would be materially affected if the victim hears 22    other testimony at trial; 23        (9) shall inform the victim of the right to have 24    present at all court proceedings, subject to the rules of 25    evidence and confidentiality, an advocate and other 26    support person of the victim's choice;   HB5052- 39 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (9.3) shall inform the victim of the right to retain 2    an attorney, at the victim's own expense, who, upon 3    written notice filed with the clerk of the court and 4    State's Attorney, is to receive copies of all notices, 5    motions, and court orders filed thereafter in the case, in 6    the same manner as if the victim were a named party in the 7    case;8        (9.5) shall inform the victim of (A) the victim's 9    right under Section 6 of this Act to make a statement at 10    the sentencing hearing; (B) the right of the victim's 11    spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other immediate 12    family and household members under Section 6 of this Act 13    to present a statement at sentencing; and (C) if a 14    presentence report is to be prepared, the right of the 15    victim's spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other 16    immediate family and household members to submit 17    information to the preparer of the presentence report 18    about the effect the offense has had on the victim and the 19    person;20        (10) at the sentencing shall make a good faith attempt 21    to explain the minimum amount of time during which the 22    defendant may actually be physically imprisoned. The 23    Office of the State's Attorney shall further notify the 24    crime victim of the right to request from the Prisoner 25    Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice information 26    concerning the release of the defendant;  HB5052- 40 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (11) shall request restitution at sentencing and as 2    part of a plea agreement if the victim requests 3    restitution;4        (12) shall, upon the court entering a verdict of not 5    guilty by reason of insanity, inform the victim of the 6    notification services available from the Department of 7    Human Services, including the statewide telephone number, 8    under subparagraph (d)(2) of this Section; 9        (13) shall provide notice within a reasonable time 10    after receipt of notice from the custodian, of the release 11    of the defendant on pretrial release or personal 12    recognizance or the release from detention of a minor who 13    has been detained;14        (14) shall explain in nontechnical language the 15    details of any plea or verdict of a defendant, or any 16    adjudication of a juvenile as a delinquent;17        (15) shall make all reasonable efforts to consult with 18    the crime victim before the Office of the State's Attorney 19    makes an offer of a plea bargain to the defendant or enters 20    into negotiations with the defendant concerning a possible 21    plea agreement, and shall consider the written statement, 22    if prepared prior to entering into a plea agreement. The 23    right to consult with the prosecutor does not include the 24    right to veto a plea agreement or to insist the case go to 25    trial. If the State's Attorney has not consulted with the 26    victim prior to making an offer or entering into plea   HB5052- 41 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    negotiations with the defendant, the Office of the State's 2    Attorney shall notify the victim of the offer or the 3    negotiations within 2 business days and confer with the 4    victim;5        (16) shall provide notice of the ultimate disposition 6    of the cases arising from an indictment or an information, 7    or a petition to have a juvenile adjudicated as a 8    delinquent for a violent crime;9        (17) shall provide notice of any appeal taken by the 10    defendant and information on how to contact the 11    appropriate agency handling the appeal, and how to request 12    notice of any hearing, oral argument, or decision of an 13    appellate court;14        (18) shall provide timely notice of any request for 15    post-conviction review filed by the defendant under 16    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, and 17    of the date, time and place of any hearing concerning the 18    petition. Whenever possible, notice of the hearing shall 19    be given within 48 hours of the court's scheduling of the 20    hearing;21        (19) shall forward a copy of any statement presented 22    under Section 6 to the Prisoner Review Board or Department 23    of Juvenile Justice to be considered in making a 24    determination under Section 3-2.5-85 or subsection (b) of 25    Section 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of Corrections;26        (20) shall, within a reasonable time, offer to meet   HB5052- 42 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    with the crime victim regarding the decision of the 2    State's Attorney not to charge an offense, and shall meet 3    with the victim, if the victim agrees. The victim has a 4    right to have an attorney, advocate, and other support 5    person of the victim's choice attend this meeting with the 6    victim; and7        (21) shall give the crime victim timely notice of any 8    decision not to pursue charges and consider the safety of 9    the victim when deciding how to give such notice. 10    (c) The court shall ensure that the rights of the victim 11are afforded. 12    (c-5) The following procedures shall be followed to afford 13victims the rights guaranteed by Article I, Section 8.1 of the 14Illinois Constitution:15        (1) Written notice. A victim may complete a written 16    notice of victim intent to assert rights on a form 17    prepared by the Office of the Attorney General and 18    provided to the victim by the State's Attorney. The victim 19    may at any time provide a revised written notice to the 20    State's Attorney. The State's Attorney shall file the 21    written notice with the court. At the beginning of any 22    court proceeding in which the right of a victim may be at 23    issue, the court and prosecutor shall review the written 24    notice to determine whether a the victim has asserted the 25    right that may be at issue.26        (2) Victim's retained attorney. A victim's attorney   HB5052- 43 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    shall file an entry of appearance limited to assertion of 2    the victim's rights. Upon the filing of the entry of 3    appearance and service on the State's Attorney and the 4    defendant, the attorney is to receive copies of all 5    notices, motions and court orders filed thereafter in the 6    case.7        (3) Standing. The victim has standing to assert the 8    rights enumerated in subsection (a) of Article I, Section 9    8.1 of the Illinois Constitution and the statutory rights 10    under Section 4 of this Act in any court exercising 11    jurisdiction over the criminal case. The prosecuting 12    attorney, a victim, or the victim's retained attorney may 13    assert the victim's rights. The defendant in the criminal 14    case has no standing to assert a right of the victim in any 15    court proceeding, including on appeal.16        (4) Assertion of and enforcement of rights.17            (A) The prosecuting attorney shall assert a 18        victim's right or request enforcement of a right by 19        filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 20        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 21        case outside the presence of the jury. The prosecuting 22        attorney shall consult with the victim and the 23        victim's attorney regarding the assertion or 24        enforcement of a right. If the prosecuting attorney 25        decides not to assert or enforce a victim's right, the 26        prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim or the   HB5052- 44 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        victim's attorney in sufficient time to allow the 2        victim or the victim's attorney to assert the right or 3        to seek enforcement of a right.4            (B) If the prosecuting attorney elects not to 5        assert a victim's right or to seek enforcement of a 6        right, the victim or the victim's attorney may assert 7        the victim's right or request enforcement of a right 8        by filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 9        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 10        case outside the presence of the jury.11            (C) If the prosecuting attorney asserts a victim's 12        right or seeks enforcement of a right, unless the 13        prosecuting attorney objects or the trial court does 14        not allow it, the victim or the victim's attorney may 15        be heard regarding the prosecuting attorney's motion 16        or may file a simultaneous motion to assert or request 17        enforcement of the victim's right. If the victim or 18        the victim's attorney was not allowed to be heard at 19        the hearing regarding the prosecuting attorney's 20        motion, and the court denies the prosecuting 21        attorney's assertion of the right or denies the 22        request for enforcement of a right, the victim or 23        victim's attorney may file a motion to assert the 24        victim's right or to request enforcement of the right 25        within 10 days of the court's ruling. The motion need 26        not demonstrate the grounds for a motion for   HB5052- 45 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        reconsideration. The court shall rule on the merits of 2        the motion.3            (D) The court shall take up and decide any motion 4        or request asserting or seeking enforcement of a 5        victim's right without delay, unless a specific time 6        period is specified by law or court rule. The reasons 7        for any decision denying the motion or request shall 8        be clearly stated on the record.9            (E) No later than January 1, 2023, the Office of 10        the Attorney General shall: 11                (i) designate an administrative authority 12            within the Office of the Attorney General to 13            receive and investigate complaints relating to the 14            provision or violation of the rights of a crime 15            victim as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 16            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act;17                (ii) create and administer a course of 18            training for employees and offices of the State of 19            Illinois that fail to comply with provisions of 20            Illinois law pertaining to the treatment of crime 21            victims as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 22            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act as 23            required by the court under Section 5 of this Act; 24            and25                (iii) have the authority to make 26            recommendations to employees and offices of the   HB5052- 46 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1            State of Illinois to respond more effectively to 2            the needs of crime victims, including regarding 3            the violation of the rights of a crime victim.4            (F) Crime victims' rights may also be asserted by 5        filing a complaint for mandamus, injunctive, or 6        declaratory relief in the jurisdiction in which the 7        victim's right is being violated or where the crime is 8        being prosecuted. For complaints or motions filed by 9        or on behalf of the victim, the clerk of court shall 10        waive filing fees that would otherwise be owed by the 11        victim for any court filing with the purpose of 12        enforcing crime victims' rights. If the court denies 13        the relief sought by the victim, the reasons for the 14        denial shall be clearly stated on the record in the 15        transcript of the proceedings, in a written opinion, 16        or in the docket entry, and the victim may appeal the 17        circuit court's decision to the appellate court. The 18        court shall issue prompt rulings regarding victims' 19        rights. Proceedings seeking to enforce victims' rights 20        shall not be stayed or subject to unreasonable delay 21        via continuances. 22        (5) Violation of rights and remedies. 23            (A) If the court determines that a victim's right 24        has been violated, the court shall determine the 25        appropriate remedy for the violation of the victim's 26        right by hearing from the victim and the parties,   HB5052- 47 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        considering all factors relevant to the issue, and 2        then awarding appropriate relief to the victim.3            (A-5) Consideration of an issue of a substantive 4        nature or an issue that implicates the constitutional 5        or statutory right of a victim at a court proceeding 6        labeled as a status hearing shall constitute a per se 7        violation of a victim's right. 8            (B) The appropriate remedy shall include only 9        actions necessary to provide the victim the right to 10        which the victim was entitled. Remedies may include, 11        but are not limited to: injunctive relief requiring 12        the victim's right to be afforded; declaratory 13        judgment recognizing or clarifying the victim's 14        rights; a writ of mandamus; and may include reopening 15        previously held proceedings; however, in no event 16        shall the court vacate a conviction. Any remedy shall 17        be tailored to provide the victim an appropriate 18        remedy without violating any constitutional right of 19        the defendant. In no event shall the appropriate 20        remedy to the victim be a new trial or damages.21        The court shall impose a mandatory training course 22    provided by the Attorney General for the employee under 23    item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4), which must 24    be successfully completed within 6 months of the entry of 25    the court order.26        This paragraph (5) takes effect January 2, 2023.  HB5052- 48 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (6) Right to be heard. Whenever a victim has the right 2    to be heard, the court shall allow the victim to exercise 3    the right in any reasonable manner the victim chooses.4        (7) Right to attend trial. 5        (A) A party must file a written motion to exclude a 6    victim from trial at least 60 days prior to the date set 7    for trial. The motion must state with specificity the 8    reason exclusion is necessary to protect a constitutional 9    right of the party, and must contain an offer of proof. The 10    court shall rule on the motion within 30 days. If the 11    motion is granted, the court shall set forth on the record 12    the facts that support its finding that the victim's 13    testimony will be materially affected if the victim hears 14    other testimony at trial.15        (B) A victim, as defined in Section 3, shall not be 16    excluded from any part of the trial unless the procedure 17    in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (7) was timely 18    followed. 19        (8) Right to have advocate and support person present 20    at court proceedings.21            (A) A party who intends to call an advocate as a 22        witness at trial must seek permission of the court 23        before the subpoena is issued. The party must file a 24        written motion at least 90 days before trial that sets 25        forth specifically the issues on which the advocate's 26        testimony is sought and an offer of proof regarding   HB5052- 49 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (i) the content of the anticipated testimony of the 2        advocate; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 3        materiality of the anticipated testimony. The court 4        shall consider the motion and make findings within 30 5        days of the filing of the motion. If the court finds by 6        a preponderance of the evidence that: (i) the 7        anticipated testimony is not protected by an absolute 8        privilege; and (ii) the anticipated testimony contains 9        relevant, admissible, and material evidence that is 10        not available through other witnesses or evidence, the 11        court shall issue a subpoena requiring the advocate to 12        appear to testify at an in camera hearing. The 13        prosecuting attorney and the victim shall have 15 days 14        to seek appellate review before the advocate is 15        required to testify at an ex parte in camera 16        proceeding. 17            The prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the 18        advocate's attorney shall be allowed to be present at 19        the ex parte in camera proceeding. If, after 20        conducting the ex parte in camera hearing, the court 21        determines that due process requires any testimony 22        regarding confidential or privileged information or 23        communications, the court shall provide to the 24        prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the advocate's 25        attorney a written memorandum on the substance of the 26        advocate's testimony. The prosecuting attorney, the   HB5052- 50 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        victim, and the advocate's attorney shall have 15 days 2        to seek appellate review before a subpoena may be 3        issued for the advocate to testify at trial. The 4        presence of the prosecuting attorney at the ex parte 5        in camera proceeding does not make the substance of 6        the advocate's testimony that the court has ruled 7        inadmissible subject to discovery.8            (B) If a victim has asserted the right to have a 9        support person present at the court proceedings, the 10        victim shall provide the name of the person the victim 11        has chosen to be the victim's support person to the 12        prosecuting attorney, within 60 days of trial. The 13        prosecuting attorney shall provide the name to the 14        defendant. If the defendant intends to call the 15        support person as a witness at trial, the defendant 16        must seek permission of the court before a subpoena is 17        issued. The defendant must file a written motion at 18        least 45 days prior to trial that sets forth 19        specifically the issues on which the support person 20        will testify and an offer of proof regarding: (i) the 21        content of the anticipated testimony of the support 22        person; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 23        materiality of the anticipated testimony.24            If the prosecuting attorney intends to call the 25        support person as a witness during the State's 26        case-in-chief, the prosecuting attorney shall inform   HB5052- 51 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        the court of this intent in the response to the 2        defendant's written motion. The victim may choose a 3        different person to be the victim's support person. 4        The court may allow the defendant to inquire about 5        matters outside the scope of the direct examination 6        during cross-examination. If the court allows the 7        defendant to do so, the support person shall be 8        allowed to remain in the courtroom after the support 9        person has testified. A defendant who fails to 10        question the support person about matters outside the 11        scope of direct examination during the State's 12        case-in-chief waives the right to challenge the 13        presence of the support person on appeal. The court 14        shall allow the support person to testify if called as 15        a witness in the defendant's case-in-chief or the 16        State's rebuttal.17            If the court does not allow the defendant to 18        inquire about matters outside the scope of the direct 19        examination, the support person shall be allowed to 20        remain in the courtroom after the support person has 21        been called by the defendant or the defendant has 22        rested. The court shall allow the support person to 23        testify in the State's rebuttal.24            If the prosecuting attorney does not intend to 25        call the support person in the State's case-in-chief, 26        the court shall verify with the support person whether   HB5052- 52 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        the support person, if called as a witness, would 2        testify as set forth in the offer of proof. If the 3        court finds that the support person would testify as 4        set forth in the offer of proof, the court shall rule 5        on the relevance, materiality, and admissibility of 6        the anticipated testimony. If the court rules the 7        anticipated testimony is admissible, the court shall 8        issue the subpoena. The support person may remain in 9        the courtroom after the support person testifies and 10        shall be allowed to testify in rebuttal.11            If the court excludes the victim's support person 12        during the State's case-in-chief, the victim shall be 13        allowed to choose another support person to be present 14        in court. 15            If the victim fails to designate a support person 16        within 60 days of trial and the defendant has 17        subpoenaed the support person to testify at trial, the 18        court may exclude the support person from the trial 19        until the support person testifies. If the court 20        excludes the support person the victim may choose 21        another person as a support person. 22        (9) Right to notice and hearing before disclosure of 23    confidential or privileged information or records.24            (A) A defendant who seeks to subpoena testimony or 25        records of or concerning the victim that are 26        confidential or privileged by law must seek permission   HB5052- 53 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        of the court before the subpoena is issued. The 2        defendant must file a written motion and an offer of 3        proof regarding the relevance, admissibility and 4        materiality of the testimony or records. If the court 5        finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:6                (i) the testimony or records are not protected 7            by an absolute privilege and8                (ii) the testimony or records contain 9            relevant, admissible, and material evidence that 10            is not available through other witnesses or 11            evidence, the court shall issue a subpoena 12            requiring the witness to appear in camera or a 13            sealed copy of the records be delivered to the 14            court to be reviewed in camera. If, after 15            conducting an in camera review of the witness 16            statement or records, the court determines that 17            due process requires disclosure of any potential 18            testimony or any portion of the records, the court 19            shall provide copies of the records that it 20            intends to disclose to the prosecuting attorney 21            and the victim. The prosecuting attorney and the 22            victim shall have 30 days to seek appellate review 23            before the records are disclosed to the defendant, 24            used in any court proceeding, or disclosed to 25            anyone or in any way that would subject the 26            testimony or records to public review. The   HB5052- 54 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1            disclosure of copies of any portion of the 2            testimony or records to the prosecuting attorney 3            under this Section does not make the records 4            subject to discovery or required to be provided to 5            the defendant.6            (B) A prosecuting attorney who seeks to subpoena 7        information or records concerning the victim that are 8        confidential or privileged by law must first request 9        the written consent of the crime victim. If the victim 10        does not provide such written consent, including where 11        necessary the appropriate signed document required for 12        waiving privilege, the prosecuting attorney must serve 13        the subpoena at least 21 days prior to the date a 14        response or appearance is required to allow the 15        subject of the subpoena time to file a motion to quash 16        or request a hearing. The prosecuting attorney must 17        also send a written notice to the victim at least 21 18        days prior to the response date to allow the victim to 19        file a motion or request a hearing. The notice to the 20        victim shall inform the victim (i) that a subpoena has 21        been issued for confidential information or records 22        concerning the victim, (ii) that the victim has the 23        right to request a hearing prior to the response date 24        of the subpoena, and (iii) how to request the hearing. 25        The notice to the victim shall also include a copy of 26        the subpoena. If requested, a hearing regarding the   HB5052- 55 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        subpoena shall occur before information or records are 2        provided to the prosecuting attorney.3        (9.5) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9.5 of 4    the Criminal Identification Act or Section 3-3013 of the 5    Counties Code, whenever a person's DNA profile is 6    collected due to the person being a victim of a crime, as 7    identified by law enforcement, that specific profile 8    collected in conjunction with that criminal investigation 9    shall not be entered into any DNA database. Nothing in 10    this paragraph (9.5) shall be interpreted to contradict 11    rules and regulations developed by the Federal Bureau of 12    Investigation relating to the National DNA Index System or 13    Combined DNA Index System.14        (10) Right to notice of court proceedings. If the 15    victim is not present at a court proceeding in which a 16    right of the victim is at issue, the court shall ask the 17    prosecuting attorney whether the victim was notified of 18    the time, place, and expected purpose of the court 19    proceeding and that the victim had a right to be heard at 20    the court proceeding. If the court determines that timely 21    notice was not given or that the victim was not adequately 22    informed of the expected purpose and procedures nature of 23    the court proceeding, the court shall not rule on any 24    substantive issues, accept a plea, or impose a sentence 25    and shall continue the hearing for the time necessary to 26    notify the victim of the time, place, and expected purpose   HB5052- 56 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    and procedures nature of the court proceeding. The time 2    between court proceedings shall not be attributable to the 3    State under Section 103-5 of the Code of Criminal 4    Procedure of 1963.5        (11) Right to timely disposition of the case. A victim 6    has the right to timely disposition of the case so as to 7    minimize the stress, cost, and inconvenience resulting 8    from the victim's involvement in the case. Before ruling 9    on a motion to continue trial or other court proceeding, 10    the court shall inquire into the circumstances for the 11    request for the delay and, if the victim has provided 12    written notice of the assertion of the right to a timely 13    disposition, and whether the victim objects to the delay. 14    If the victim objects, the prosecutor shall inform the 15    court of the victim's objections. If the prosecutor has 16    not conferred with the victim about the continuance, the 17    prosecutor shall inform the court of the attempts to 18    confer. If the court finds the attempts of the prosecutor 19    to confer with the victim were inadequate to protect the 20    victim's right to be heard, the court shall give the 21    prosecutor at least 3 but not more than 5 business days to 22    confer with the victim. In ruling on a motion to continue, 23    the court shall consider the reasons for the requested 24    continuance, the number and length of continuances that 25    have been granted, the victim's objections and procedures 26    to avoid further delays. If a continuance is granted over   HB5052- 57 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    the victim's objection, the court shall specify on the 2    record the reasons for the continuance and the procedures 3    that have been or will be taken to avoid further delays.4        (12) Right to Restitution.5            (A) If the victim has asserted the right to 6        restitution and the amount of restitution is known at 7        the time of sentencing, the court shall enter the 8        judgment of restitution at the time of sentencing. 9            (B) If the victim has asserted the right to 10        restitution and the amount of restitution is not known 11        at the time of sentencing, the prosecutor shall, 12        within 5 days after sentencing, notify the victim what 13        information and documentation related to restitution 14        is needed and that the information and documentation 15        must be provided to the prosecutor within 45 days 16        after sentencing. Failure to timely provide 17        information and documentation related to restitution 18        shall be deemed a waiver of the right to restitution. 19        The prosecutor shall file and serve within 60 days 20        after sentencing a proposed judgment for restitution 21        and a notice that includes information concerning the 22        identity of any victims or other persons seeking 23        restitution, whether any victim or other person 24        expressly declines restitution, the nature and amount 25        of any damages together with any supporting 26        documentation, a restitution amount recommendation,   HB5052- 58 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        and the names of any co-defendants and their case 2        numbers. Within 30 days after receipt of the proposed 3        judgment for restitution, the defendant shall file any 4        objection to the proposed judgment, a statement of 5        grounds for the objection, and a financial statement. 6        If the defendant does not file an objection, the court 7        may enter the judgment for restitution without further 8        proceedings. If the defendant files an objection and 9        either party requests a hearing, the court shall 10        schedule a hearing.11        (12.5) When a person reports being a crime victim, as 12    defined in Section 3, the person shall have the right to be 13    treated with fairness and respect during the investigatory 14    process, including the right to be free from deception, 15    which is the knowing communication of false facts about 16    evidence. 17        (13) Access to presentence reports.18            (A) The victim may request a copy of the 19        presentence report prepared under the Unified Code of 20        Corrections from the State's Attorney. The State's 21        Attorney shall redact the following information before 22        providing a copy of the report:23                (i) the defendant's mental history and 24            condition;25                (ii) any evaluation prepared under subsection 26            (b) or (b-5) of Section 5-3-2; and  HB5052- 59 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1                (iii) the name, address, phone number, and 2            other personal information about any other victim.3            (B) The State's Attorney or the defendant may 4        request the court redact other information in the 5        report that may endanger the safety of any person.6            (C) The State's Attorney may orally disclose to 7        the victim any of the information that has been 8        redacted if there is a reasonable likelihood that the 9        information will be stated in court at the sentencing.10            (D) The State's Attorney must advise the victim 11        that the victim must maintain the confidentiality of 12        the report and other information. Any dissemination of 13        the report or information that was not stated at a 14        court proceeding constitutes indirect criminal 15        contempt of court. 16        (14) Appellate relief. If the trial court denies the 17    relief requested, the victim, the victim's attorney, or 18    the prosecuting attorney may file an appeal within 30 days 19    of the trial court's ruling. The trial or appellate court 20    may stay the court proceedings if the court finds that a 21    stay would not violate a constitutional right of the 22    defendant. If the appellate court denies the relief 23    sought, the reasons for the denial shall be clearly stated 24    in a written opinion. In any appeal in a criminal case, the 25    State may assert as error the court's denial of any crime 26    victim's right in the proceeding to which the appeal   HB5052- 60 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    relates.2        (15) Limitation on appellate relief. In no case shall 3    an appellate court provide a new trial to remedy the 4    violation of a victim's right. 5        (16) The right to be reasonably protected from the 6    accused throughout the criminal justice process and the 7    right to have the safety of the victim and the victim's 8    family considered in determining whether to release the 9    defendant, and setting conditions of release after arrest 10    and conviction. A victim of domestic violence, a sexual 11    offense, or stalking may request the entry of a protective 12    order under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure 13    of 1963. 14    (d) Procedures after the imposition of sentence.15        (1) The Prisoner Review Board shall inform a victim or 16    any other concerned citizen, upon written request, of the 17    prisoner's release on parole, mandatory supervised 18    release, electronic detention, work release, international 19    transfer or exchange, or by the custodian, other than the 20    Department of Juvenile Justice, of the discharge of any 21    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a crime 22    from State custody and by the sheriff of the appropriate 23    county of any such person's final discharge from county 24    custody. The Prisoner Review Board, upon written request, 25    shall provide to a victim or any other concerned citizen a 26    recent photograph of any person convicted of a felony,   HB5052- 61 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    upon his or her release from custody. The Prisoner Review 2    Board, upon written request, shall inform a victim or any 3    other concerned citizen when feasible at least 7 days 4    prior to the prisoner's release on furlough of the times 5    and dates of such furlough. Upon written request by the 6    victim or any other concerned citizen, the State's 7    Attorney shall notify the person once of the times and 8    dates of release of a prisoner sentenced to periodic 9    imprisonment. Notification shall be based on the most 10    recent information as to the victim's or other concerned 11    citizen's residence or other location available to the 12    notifying authority. 13        (1.5) The Prisoner Review Board shall notify a victim 14    of a prisoner's pardon, commutation of sentence, release 15    on furlough, or early release from State custody, if the 16    victim has previously requested that notification. The 17    notification shall be based upon the most recent 18    information available to the Board as to the victim's 19    residence or other location. The notification requirement 20    under this paragraph (1.5) is in addition to any 21    notification requirements under any other statewide victim 22    notification systems. The Board shall document its efforts 23    to provide the required notification if a victim alleges 24    lack of notification under this paragraph (1.5). 25        (2) When the defendant has been committed to the 26    Department of Human Services pursuant to Section 5-2-4 or   HB5052- 62 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    any other provision of the Unified Code of Corrections, 2    the victim may request to be notified by the releasing 3    authority of the approval by the court of an on-grounds 4    pass, a supervised off-grounds pass, an unsupervised 5    off-grounds pass, or conditional release; the release on 6    an off-grounds pass; the return from an off-grounds pass; 7    transfer to another facility; conditional release; escape; 8    death; or final discharge from State custody. The 9    Department of Human Services shall establish and maintain 10    a statewide telephone number to be used by victims to make 11    notification requests under these provisions and shall 12    publicize this telephone number on its website and to the 13    State's Attorney of each county.14        (3) In the event of an escape from State custody, the 15    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 16    Justice immediately shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 17    of the escape and the Prisoner Review Board shall notify 18    the victim. The notification shall be based upon the most 19    recent information as to the victim's residence or other 20    location available to the Board. When no such information 21    is available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts 22    to obtain the information and make the notification. When 23    the escapee is apprehended, the Department of Corrections 24    or the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately shall 25    notify the Prisoner Review Board and the Board shall 26    notify the victim. The notification requirement under this   HB5052- 63 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    paragraph (3) is in addition to any notification 2    requirements under any other statewide victim notification 3    systems. The Board shall document its efforts to provide 4    the required notification if a victim alleges lack of 5    notification under this paragraph (3). 6        (4) The victim of the crime for which the prisoner has 7    been sentenced has the right to register with the Prisoner 8    Review Board's victim registry. Victims registered with 9    the Board shall receive reasonable written notice not less 10    than 30 days prior to the parole hearing or target 11    aftercare release date. The victim has the right to submit 12    a victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner 13    Review Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice in 14    writing, on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or 15    in the form of a recording prior to the parole hearing or 16    target aftercare release date, or in person at the parole 17    hearing or aftercare release protest hearing, or by 18    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 19    of this Section. The victim shall be notified within 7 20    days after the prisoner has been granted parole or 21    aftercare release and shall be informed of the right to 22    inspect the registry of parole decisions, established 23    under subsection (g) of Section 3-3-5 of the Unified Code 24    of Corrections. The provisions of this paragraph (4) are 25    subject to the Open Parole Hearings Act. Victim statements 26    provided to the Board shall be confidential and   HB5052- 64 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    privileged, including any statements received prior to 2    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 3    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement 4    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public.5        (4-1) The crime victim, including any person who has 6    had a final, plenary, non-emergency, or emergency 7    protective order granted against the petitioner or parole 8    candidate under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal 9    Procedure of 1963, the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 10    1986, the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No 11    Contact Order Act, has the right to submit a victim 12    statement, in support or opposition, for consideration by 13    the Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile 14    Justice prior to or at a hearing to determine the 15    conditions of mandatory supervised release of a person 16    sentenced to a determinate sentence or at a hearing on 17    revocation of mandatory supervised release of a person 18    sentenced to a determinate sentence. A victim statement 19    may be submitted in writing, on film, videotape, or other 20    electronic means, or in the form of a recording, or orally 21    at a hearing, or by calling the toll-free number 22    established in subsection (f) of this Section. Victim 23    statements provided to the Board shall be confidential and 24    privileged, including any statements received prior to 25    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement   HB5052- 65 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public. 2        (4-2) The crime victim, including any person who has 3    had a final, plenary, non-emergency, or emergency 4    protective order granted against the petitioner or parole 5    candidate under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal 6    Procedure of 1963, the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 7    1986, the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No 8    Contact Order Act, has the right to submit a victim 9    statement, in support or opposition, to the Prisoner 10    Review Board for consideration at an executive clemency 11    hearing as provided in Section 3-3-13 of the Unified Code 12    of Corrections. A victim statement may be submitted in 13    writing, on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or 14    in the form of a recording prior to a hearing, or orally at 15    a hearing, or by calling the toll-free number established 16    in subsection (f) of this Section. Victim statements 17    provided to the Board shall be confidential and 18    privileged, including any statements received prior to 19    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 20    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement 21    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public. 22        (5) If a statement is presented under Section 6, the 23    Prisoner Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice 24    shall inform the victim of any order of discharge pursuant 25    to Section 3-2.5-85 or 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of 26    Corrections.  HB5052- 66 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (6) At the written or oral request of the victim of the 2    crime for which the prisoner was sentenced or the State's 3    Attorney of the county where the person seeking parole or 4    aftercare release was prosecuted, the Prisoner Review 5    Board or Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the 6    victim and the State's Attorney of the county where the 7    person seeking parole or aftercare release was prosecuted 8    of the death of the prisoner if the prisoner died while on 9    parole or aftercare release or mandatory supervised 10    release.11        (7) When a defendant who has been committed to the 12    Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 13    Justice, or the Department of Human Services is released 14    or discharged and subsequently committed to the Department 15    of Human Services as a sexually violent person and the 16    victim had requested to be notified by the releasing 17    authority of the defendant's discharge, conditional 18    release, death, or escape from State custody, the 19    releasing authority shall provide to the Department of 20    Human Services such information that would allow the 21    Department of Human Services to contact the victim.22        (8) When a defendant has been convicted of a sex 23    offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 24    Registration Act and has been sentenced to the Department 25    of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 26    Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile   HB5052- 67 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    Justice shall notify the victim of the sex offense of the 2    prisoner's eligibility for release on parole, aftercare 3    release, mandatory supervised release, electronic 4    detention, work release, international transfer or 5    exchange, or by the custodian of the discharge of any 6    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a sex 7    offense from State custody and by the sheriff of the 8    appropriate county of any such person's final discharge 9    from county custody. The notification shall be made to the 10    victim at least 30 days, whenever possible, before release 11    of the sex offender. 12    (e) (Blank). The officials named in this Section may 13satisfy some or all of their obligations to provide notices 14and other information through participation in a statewide 15victim and witness notification system established by the 16Attorney General under Section 8.5 of this Act.17    (f) The Prisoner Review Board shall establish a toll-free 18number that may be accessed by the crime victim to present a 19victim statement to the Board in accordance with paragraphs 20(4), (4-1), and (4-2) of subsection (d). The Prisoner Review 21Board shall provide registered and identified victims with the 22contact information for the State victim assistance hotline as 23part of its process to obtain a victim witness statement and as 24part of its notification. 25    (g) The Prisoner Review Board shall publish on its 26official website, and provide to registered victims,   HB5052- 68 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1procedural information on how to submit victim statements. 2(Source: P.A. 104-11, eff. 6-20-25; 104-173, eff. 1-1-26; 3revised 11-21-25.) 4    Section 20. The Address Confidentiality for Victims of 5Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human Trafficking, or 6Stalking Act is amended by changing Sections 10, 15, 20, 25, 730, 35, and 40 as follows: 8    (750 ILCS 61/10)9    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 10otherwise requires:11    "Confidential address" means the Illinois residential 12street address of an individual that is not to be disclosed. 13    "Substitute address" means the address assigned to a 14program participant by the Address Confidentiality Program. 15    "Address" means a residential street address, school 16address, or work address of an individual, as specified on the 17individual's application to be a program participant under 18this Act.19    "Program participant" means a person certified as a 20program participant under this Act.21    "Household member" means an individual residing at the 22same Illinois residential street address as a program 23participant who is the victim of domestic violence, sexual 24assault, human trafficking, or stalking.  HB5052- 69 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    "Eligible person" means a person 18 years of age or older 2who is the victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, human 3trafficking, or stalking; the parent or guardian of a minor or 4disabled adult who is a victim of domestic violence, sexual 5assault, human trafficking, or stalking; or a household member 6of a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, human 7trafficking, or stalking. 8    "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as in the 9Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 and includes a threat 10of domestic violence against an individual in a domestic 11situation, regardless of whether the domestic violence or 12threat has been reported to law enforcement officers.13    "Human trafficking" means the practices set forth in 14subsection (b), (c), or (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 15Code of 2012, regardless of whether the victim has reported 16the trafficking to law enforcement officers. 17    "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as sexual conduct or 18sexual penetration as defined in the Civil No Contact Order 19Act. "Sexual assault" includes a threat of sexual assault, 20regardless of whether the sexual assault or threat has been 21reported to law enforcement officers.22    "Stalking" has the same meaning as in the Stalking No 23Contact Order Act. "Stalking" includes a threat of stalking, 24regardless of whether the stalking or threat has been reported 25to law enforcement officers.26(Source: P.A. 101-270, eff. 1-1-21; 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.)   HB5052- 70 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    (750 ILCS 61/15)2    Sec. 15. Address confidentiality program; application; 3certification.4    (a) An eligible applicant, as defined by this Section, An 5adult person, a parent or guardian acting on behalf of a minor, 6or a guardian acting on behalf of a person with a disability, 7as defined in Article 11a of the Probate Act of 1975, may apply 8to the Attorney General to have an address designated by the 9Attorney General serve as the person's address or the address 10of the minor or person with a disability. The Attorney General 11shall approve an application if it is filed in the manner and 12on the form prescribed by him or her and if it contains:13        (1) a sworn statement by the applicant that the 14    applicant has good reason to believe (i) that the 15    applicant, or the minor or person with a disability on 16    whose behalf the application is made, is a victim of 17    domestic violence, sexual assault, human trafficking, or 18    stalking; or and (ii) the applicant is a household member 19    of a program participant; that the applicant fears for his 20    or her safety or his or her children's safety, or the 21    safety of the minor or person with a disability on whose 22    behalf the application is made; 23        (1.3) a sworn statement that the applicant fears for 24    the applicant's safety or the applicant's children's 25    safety, or the safety of the minor or person with a   HB5052- 71 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    disability on whose behalf the application is made, or the 2    safety of a household member; 3        (1.5) documentation supporting the statements made 4    under subsections (1) and (1.3); 5        (2) a designation of the Attorney General as agent for 6    purposes of service of process and receipt of mail;7        (3) an Illinois a State mailing address where the 8    applicant can be contacted by the Attorney General, and 9    the phone number or numbers where the applicant can be 10    called by the Attorney General;11        (3.5) proof of an Illinois a State residential street 12    address where the applicant resides or a signed statement 13    affirming the applicant's status as homeless in Illinois 14    indicating that the applicant will be moving to an 15    Illinois residential street address within 30 days this 16    State; 17        (4) the new Illinois residential street address 18    "confidential address" address or addresses that the 19    applicant requests not be disclosed for the reason that 20    disclosure will increase the risk of domestic violence, 21    sexual assault, human trafficking, or stalking; and22        (5) the signature of the applicant and of any 23    individual or representative of any office designated in 24    writing under Section 40 of this Act who assisted in the 25    preparation of the application, and the date on which the 26    applicant signed the application.  HB5052- 72 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    (a-1) For applicants applying on behalf of a minor or 2person with a disability, the Attorney General may request 3proof of guardianship, as defined in Article 11a of the 4Probate Act of 1975, or proof of legal custody, as defined in 5Section 10-20.12b of the School Code, before certifying a 6minor or person with a disability as a program participant. 7    (b) Applications shall be filed with the office of the 8Attorney General.9    (c) Upon filing a properly completed application, the 10Attorney General shall certify the applicant as a program 11participant. Applicants shall be certified for 4 years 12following the date of filing unless the certification is 13withdrawn or invalidated before that date. A participant whose 14certification has not been withdrawn or cancelled may reapply 15to the Address Confidentiality Program to renew the 16applicant's certification for an additional 4 years. The 17Attorney General shall by rule establish a renewal procedure.18    (d) A person who falsely attests in an application that 19disclosure of the applicant's confidential address would 20endanger the applicant's safety or the safety of the 21applicant's children or the minor or disabled incapacitated 22person on whose behalf the application is made, or the safety 23of a household member, or who knowingly provides false or 24incorrect information upon making an application, is guilty of 25a Class 3 felony.26(Source: P.A. 101-270, eff. 1-1-21; 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.)   HB5052- 73 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    (750 ILCS 61/20)2    Sec. 20. Certification cancellation. 3    (a) If the program participant obtains a legal change of 4identity to a new, unassociated name a name change, the 5applicant loses he or she loses certification as a program 6participant.7    (b) The Attorney General may cancel a program 8participant's certification if:9             (1) a program participant fails to provide the 10    Attorney General with 7 days' notice before there is a 11    change in the confidential residential street address, 12    phone number, or legal name, from the one listed on the 13    application; , unless the program participant provides the 14    Attorney General within 7 days notice before the change of 15    address.16        (2) mail forwarded by the Attorney General to the 17    program participant's confidential address is returned as 18    nondeliverable;19        (3) a program participant fails to file a new 20    application within 30 days after becoming 18 years of age;21        (4) a program participant is unable or unwilling to 22    maintain the confidentiality of the program participant's 23    confidential address;24        (5) a program participant fails to respond to the 25    program's request for verification of the participant's   HB5052- 74 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    residential address within 7 days; or2        (6) a program participant is no longer an eligible 3    person as defined in Section 10. 4    (c) A person whose certification is cancelled for any 5reason listed in subsections (a) or (b) may reapply to the 6program at any time after the person's certification has been 7cancelled. The Attorney General may cancel certification of a 8program participant if mail forwarded by the Attorney General 9to the program participant's address is returned as 10nondeliverable.11    (d) The Attorney General shall cancel certification of a 12program participant who applies using false information.13    (e) If a program participant loses certification or the 14certification is cancelled, mail addressed to the former 15program participant must be returned to the sender. 16(Source: P.A. 91-494, eff. 1-1-00.) 17    (750 ILCS 61/25)18    Sec. 25. Agency use of designated address. 19    (a) A program participant may request that State and local 20agencies use the substitute address designated by the Attorney 21General as the applicant's his or her address. When creating a 22new public record, State and local agencies shall accept the 23address designated by the Attorney General as a program 24participant's substitute address, unless the Attorney General 25has determined that:   HB5052- 75 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1        (1) the agency has a bona fide statutory or 2    administrative requirement for the use of the address that 3    would otherwise be confidential under this Act; and 4        (2) this address will be used only for those statutory 5    and administrative purposes.6    (b) A program participant may use the substitute address 7address designated by the Attorney General as the applicant's 8his or her work address.9    (c) The office of the Attorney General shall forward only 10all first class mail to the appropriate program participants 11within 7 business days. Mail for cancelled participants or 12mail that cannot be forwarded within 7 business days shall be 13returned to sender. Program participants who withdraw from the 14program may provide a new mailing address and request to have 15mail forwarded for 30 days following their withdrawal.16(Source: P.A. 91-494, eff. 1-1-00.) 17    (750 ILCS 61/30)18    Sec. 30. Voting by program participant; use of designated 19address by election authority.20    (a) A program participant who is otherwise qualified to 21vote may register to vote by submitting an Illinois Address 22Confidentiality Program Voter Registration Application created 23by the State Board of Elections to the appropriate election 24authority. The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules to 25ensure the integrity of the voting process and the   HB5052- 76 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1confidentiality of the program participant. Upon request, the 2election authority shall transmit the vote by mail ballot to 3the program participant at the address designated by the 4participant in the applicant's his or her application. Neither 5the name nor the address of a program participant shall be 6included in any list of registered voters available to the 7public.8    (b) The election authority may not make the participant's 9address contained in voter registration records available for 10public inspection or copying except under the following 11circumstances:12        (1) if requested by a law enforcement agency, to the 13    law enforcement agency; and14        (2) if directed by a court order, to a person 15    identified in the order.16(Source: P.A. 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.) 17    (750 ILCS 61/35)18    Sec. 35. Disclosure of address prohibited; exceptions. The 19Attorney General may not make a program participant's 20confidential address, other than the address designated by the 21Attorney General, available for inspection or copying, except 22under the following circumstances:23        (a) if requested by a law enforcement agency, to the 24    law enforcement agency;25        (b) if directed by a court order, to a person   HB5052- 77 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1    identified in the order; and2        (c) (blank).3    A program participant's address and phone number on file 4with the Attorney General are not subject to disclosure under 5the Freedom of Information Act. 6(Source: P.A. 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.) 7    (750 ILCS 61/40)8    Sec. 40. Assistance for program applicants. The Attorney 9General may shall designate State and local agencies and 10nonprofit agencies that provide counseling and shelter 11services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, 12human trafficking, or stalking to assist persons applying to 13be program participants. Any assistance and counseling 14rendered by the office of the Attorney General or its 15designees to applicants shall in no way be construed as legal 16advice.17(Source: P.A. 101-270, eff. 1-1-21; 102-292, eff. 1-1-22.)  HB5052- 78 -LRB104 19576 RLC 33024 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    410 ILCS 70/1afrom Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-1a4    410 ILCS 70/2-2 new5    410 ILCS 70/5from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 87-56    705 ILCS 405/5-9057    725 ILCS 120/3from Ch. 38, par. 14038    725 ILCS 120/49    725 ILCS 120/4.510    750 ILCS 61/1011    750 ILCS 61/1512    750 ILCS 61/2013    750 ILCS 61/2514    750 ILCS 61/3015    750 ILCS 61/3516    750 ILCS 61/40